Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 2 Prohibited Acts

Cross references.

Hunting while under influence of intoxicating wines, beers, or liquor, §

27-3-7

.

Driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs, §

40-5-67

et seq.

Regulation of operation and patronage of billiard rooms where alcoholic beverages are sold, §

43-8-1

et seq.

Civil liability of persons selling adulterated alcoholic beverages, § 51-1-24.

3-3-20.
Sale of alcoholic beverages on Sundays, election days, and Christmas Day.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this Code section or except as specifically authorized by law, no person knowingly and intentionally shall sell or offer to sell alcoholic beverages on Sunday.

As used in this subsection, the term “day” means that period of time beginning with the opening of the polls and ending with the closing of the polls.

Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph and paragraph (3) of this subsection, in any county or municipality in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is authorized, the sale of alcoholic beverages in compliance with such authorization shall be authorized and legal on any election day.

The local governing authority of any county in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is authorized and the local governing authority of any municipality in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is authorized may, by ordinance, prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages on any election days. In any case where the governing authority of a county or municipality has passed an ordinance prohibiting the sale of alcoholic beverages on any election days as authorized by this subparagraph, such prohibition shall apply only within the territorial boundaries for which the election is held but such territorial boundaries shall not include any property owned or operated by a county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this state for airport purposes if no person resides on such publicly owned or operated property.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this subsection, it shall be unlawful for any person to sell alcoholic beverages within 250 feet of any polling place or of the outer edge of any building within which such polling place is established on primary or election days.

Any person violating the provisions of this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

The governing authority of any county or municipality may, by ordinance or resolution, prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages on Christmas Day.

In all municipalities within any county having a population of 400,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, alcoholic beverages may be sold on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight at festivals. As used in this paragraph, the term “festival” means a specific outdoor public celebration or gathering for which a license or permit has been issued by the appropriate governing authority which involves the use either of public parks or public streets and which includes entertainment, dancing, music, dramatic productions, art exhibition, parades, or the sale of merchandise, food or alcohol, or any combination of the foregoing; and which of necessity requires for its successful execution the provision and coordination of municipal services to a degree significantly over and above that which the city routinely provides under ordinary everyday circumstances. The definition of “festival,” as used in this paragraph, does not include events which are solely parades, foot races, or political demonstrations unless such parade, foot race, or political demonstration is proposed as an integral part of a larger “festival,” as defined in this paragraph.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, all persons and entities selling alcoholic beverages pursuant to this subsection shall fully comply with all other applicable state and local license and permit requirements.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 148, §§ 6, 7; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 14; Ga. L. 1971, p. 864, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 721, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1236, § 1; Code 1933, § 58-813, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 1316, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-507, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 460, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 19; Ga. L. 1982, p. 890, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1688, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1508, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 10, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1694, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1405, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “Lawyers Who Represent Local Governments,” see 23 Ga. St. B. J. 58 (1987).

For note on 2000 amendment of this Code section, see 17 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 4 (2000).

For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

For article, “Regulation of Alcoholic Beverages Generally,” see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 255 (2011).

For article on alcoholic beverages, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2018).

3-3-21.
Sales of alcoholic beverages near churches, school buildings, or other sites.

No person knowingly and intentionally may sell or offer to sell:

Any distilled spirits in or within 100 yards of any church building or within 200 yards of any school building, educational building, school grounds, or college campus;

Any wine or malt beverages within 100 yards of any school building, school grounds, or college campus. This subparagraph shall not apply at any location for which a license has been issued prior to July 1, 1981, nor to the renewal of such license. Nor shall this subparagraph apply at any location for which a new license is applied for if the sale of wine and beer was lawful at such location at any time during the 12 months immediately preceding such application. Nothing in this subparagraph shall prohibit a grocery store licensed for the retail sale of only wine and malt beverages for consumption off the premises from selling wine or malt beverages within 100 yards of any school building, or college campus, where so permitted by resolution or ordinance of the county or municipality. As used in this subparagraph, the term “grocery store” means a retail establishment which has a total retail floor space of at least 10,000 square feet of which at least 85 percent is reserved for the sale of food and other nonalcoholic items, conducts all of its sales inside the building containing its retail floor space, and meets such other criteria as may be required by the local governing authority of the county or municipality; or

Any distilled spirits, wine, or malt beverages within 100 yards of an alcoholic treatment center owned and operated by this state or any county or municipal government therein. This paragraph shall not apply to any business having a license in effect on July 1, 1981.

As used in this subsection, the term “school building” or “educational building” shall apply only to state, county, city, or church school buildings and to such buildings at such other schools in which are taught subjects commonly taught in the common schools and colleges of this state and which are public schools or private schools as defined in subsection (b) of Code Section 20-2-690.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall prohibit the licensing of the sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages by:

Hotels of 50 rooms or more which have been in continuous operation for a period of at least five years preceding July 1, 1981;

Bona fide private clubs, owning their own homes, subject to licensing under Chapter 7 of this title;

Licensees for the retail sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises only who shall be subject to regulation as to distances from churches, schools, and college campuses by counties and municipalities;

Licensees for retail sale packages of alcoholic beverages for consumption off the premises who shall be subject to regulation as to distances from college campuses by counties and municipalities; provided, however, that such distances may be less restrictive than those provided in this Code section but shall not be more restrictive; and provided, further, that if such licensees are not regulated as to distances from college campuses by a county or municipality, then the distances set forth in this Code section shall govern such licensees; and

Licensees for retail sale packages of wine and malt beverages for consumption off the premises who shall be subject to regulation as to distances from school grounds by counties and municipalities; provided, however, that if such licensees are not regulated as to distances from school grounds, then the distances set forth in this Code section shall govern such licensees.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “college campus” shall include, but shall not be limited to, all buildings and grounds of any public or private technical school, vocational school, college, university, or other institution of postsecondary education.

For purposes of this Code section, distances shall be measured by the most direct route of travel on the ground.

Reserved.

As used in this subsection, the term “housing authority property” means any property containing 300 housing units or fewer owned or operated by a housing authority created by Article 1 of Chapter 3 of Title 8, the “Housing Authorities Law.”

No person knowingly and intentionally may sell any alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises within 100 yards of any housing authority property. This subsection shall not apply at any location for which a license has been issued prior to July 1, 2000, nor to the renewal of such license. Nor shall this subsection apply at any location for which a new license is applied for if the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises was lawful at such location at any time during the 12 months immediately preceding such application.

History.

Laws 1808, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 851; Code 1863, § 4448; Code 1868, § 4490; Code 1873, § 4575; Code 1882, § 4575; Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 132, § 1; Penal Code 1895, § 434; Penal Code 1910, § 435; Code 1933, § 58-601; Ga. L. 1935, p. 73, § 15B; Ga. L. 1937, p. 148, § 2; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 9; Ga. L. 1945, p. 447, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1973, p. 610, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-508, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1265, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 20; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1300, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 3; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1653, § 1; Ga. L. 2013, p. 897, § 2/HB 517; Ga. L. 2015, p. 81, § 1/HB 85; Ga. L. 2017, p. 759, § 1/HB 510; Ga. L. 2020, p. 615, § 4/HB 879; Ga. L. 2021, p. 391, § 1/HB 392.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “Reserved.” for the former provisions of subsection (d), which read: “(d)(1) In counties having a population of not less than 175,000 nor more than 195,000, according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census, the distances provided in subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of this Code section for separation of businesses licensed under this title from churches and schools shall be measured as follows:

“(A) From the property line of the tract on which is located the business regulated under this title;

“(B) To the property line of the tract on which is located the church, school ground, or college campus; and

“(C) Along a straight line which describes the shortest distance between the two property lines.

“(2) No license in effect on April 13, 1979, shall be revoked before its date of expiration by reason of the method of measurement set out in this subsection if the license was granted in reliance on another method of measurement. No application for a license or for a renewal shall be denied by reason of the method of measurement set out in this subsection if the application is for premises for which a license was granted prior to April 13, 1979, in reliance on another method of measurement.”.

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 3, 2020, deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(2); in paragraph (b)(3), substituted “college campuses” for “colleges” and substituted “; and” for the period at the end; added paragraph (b)(4); and added the ending undesignated paragraph in subsection (b).

The 2021 amendment,

effective May 4, 2021, deleted “school grounds,” following “any school building,” in the fourth sentence in subparagraph (a)(1)(B); and, in subsection (b), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(3), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (b)(4), and added paragraph (b)(5).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 897, § 1/HB 517, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that there are neighborhoods and downtown areas in this state near college campuses that are underserved by grocery stores, making it difficult for residents who live in such neighborhoods and downtown areas to access daily essentials and adequate food supplies and nutrition, especially those residents who do not own automobiles. The General Assembly further finds that owners of grocery stores may be reluctant to locate such stores in areas in which it is not possible to sell packages of wine and malt beverages when such sales are permitted elsewhere in the county or municipality. The General Assembly further finds that allowing a local governing authority of a county or municipality to have local control of the distance requirements for the package sales of wine and malt beverages near college campuses will permit such local governments to determine how to best serve the public health, safety, and welfare of its citizens.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Lawyers Who Represent Local Governments,” see 23 Ga. St. B. J. 58 (1987).

3-3-21.1.
Possession of alcoholic beverages on the grounds of a public school.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, no person shall possess any alcoholic beverages upon the grounds or within any structure of a public elementary school; public high school; or public trade, vocational, or industrial school.

Subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to any situation where alcoholic beverages are used by a teacher for educational purposes nor to any situation where alcoholic beverages are used in a religious ceremony or observance.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-508.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 625, § 1.

3-3-22.
Sale or furnishing of alcoholic beverages to intoxicated persons.

No alcoholic beverage shall be sold, bartered, exchanged, given, provided, or furnished to any person who is in a state of noticeable intoxication.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 15; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 1206, §§ 2, 5; Code 1933, § 5A-509, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 21.

Cross references.

Liability for acts of intoxicated persons, § 51-1-40.

Law reviews.

For note discussing tavern keeper liability in Georgia for injury caused by a person to whom an intoxicant was sold, see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 239 (1974).

3-3-23.
Furnishing to, purchase of, or possession by persons under 21 years of age of alcoholic beverages; identification; serving, or handling by persons under 21 years of age in the course of employment; seller’s receipt of false identification; immunity for seeking medical assistance for alcohol related overdose.

Except as otherwise authorized by law:

No person knowingly, directly or through another person, shall furnish, cause to be furnished, or permit any person in such person’s employ to furnish any alcoholic beverage to any person under 21 years of age;

No person under 21 years of age shall purchase, attempt to purchase, or knowingly possess any alcoholic beverage;

No person under 21 years of age shall misrepresent such person’s age in any manner whatever for the purpose of obtaining illegally any alcoholic beverage;

No person knowingly or intentionally shall act as an agent to purchase or acquire any alcoholic beverage for or on behalf of a person under 21 years of age; or

No person under 21 years of age shall misrepresent his or her identity or use any false identification for the purpose of purchasing or obtaining any alcoholic beverage.

The prohibitions contained in paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply with respect to the sale, purchase, or possession of alcoholic beverages for consumption:

For medical purposes pursuant to a prescription of a physician duly authorized to practice medicine in this state; or

At a religious ceremony.

The prohibitions contained in paragraphs (1), (2), and (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply with respect to the possession of alcoholic beverages for consumption by a person under 21 years of age when the parent or guardian of the person under 21 years of age gives the alcoholic beverage to the person and when possession is in the home of the parent or guardian and such parent or guardian is present.

The prohibition contained in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply with respect to sale of alcoholic beverages by a person when such person has been furnished with proper identification showing that the person to whom the alcoholic beverage is sold is 21 years of age or older. For purposes of this subsection, the term “proper identification” means any document issued by a governmental agency containing a description of the person, such person’s photograph, or both, and giving such person’s date of birth and includes, without being limited to, a passport, military identification card, driver’s license, or an identification card authorized under Code Sections 40-5-100 through 40-5-104. “Proper identification” shall not include a birth certificate and shall not include any traffic citation and complaint form.

If such conduct is not otherwise prohibited pursuant to Code Section 3-3-24, nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to prohibit any person under 21 years of age from:

Dispensing, serving, selling, or handling alcoholic beverages as a part of employment in any licensed establishment;

Being employed in any establishment in which alcoholic beverages are distilled or manufactured; or

Taking orders for and having possession of alcoholic beverages as a part of employment in a licensed establishment.

Testimony by any person under 21 years of age, when given in an administrative or judicial proceeding against another person for violation of any provision of this Code section, shall not be used in any administrative or judicial proceedings brought against such testifying person under 21 years of age.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to modify, amend, or supersede Chapter 11 of Title 15.

In any case where a reasonable or prudent person could reasonably be in doubt as to whether or not the person to whom an alcoholic beverage is to be sold or otherwise furnished is actually 21 years of age or older, it shall be the duty of the person selling or otherwise furnishing such alcoholic beverage to request to see and to be furnished with proper identification as provided for in subsection (d) of this Code section in order to verify the age of such person; and the failure to make such request and verification in any case where the person to whom the alcoholic beverage is sold or otherwise furnished is less than 21 years of age may be considered by the trier of fact in determining whether the person selling or otherwise furnishing such alcoholic beverage did so knowingly.

Any retailer or retail consumption dealer, or any person acting on behalf of such retailer or retail consumption dealer, who upon requesting proper identification from a person attempting to purchase alcoholic beverages from such retailer or retail consumption dealer pursuant to subsection (h) of this Code section is tendered a driver’s license which indicates that such driver’s license is falsified, is not the driver’s license of the person presenting it, or that such person is under the age of 21 years, the person to whom said license is tendered shall be authorized to either write down the name, address, and license number or to seize and retain such driver’s license and in either event shall immediately thereafter summon a law enforcement officer who shall be authorized to seize the license either at the scene or at such time as the license can be located. The procedures and rules connected with the retention of such license by the officer shall be the same as those provided for the acceptance of a driver’s license as bail on arrest for traffic offenses pursuant to Code Section 17-6-11.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Alcohol related overdose” means an acute condition, including, but not limited to, extreme physical illness, decreased level of consciousness, respiratory depression, coma, mania, or death, resulting from the consumption or use of alcohol or that a layperson would reasonably believe to be resulting from the consumption or use of alcohol for which medical assistance is required.

“Medical assistance” means aid provided to a person believed to be experiencing an alcohol related overdose by a health care professional licensed, registered, or certified under the laws of this state who, acting within his or her lawful scope of practice, may provide diagnosis, treatment, or emergency services relative to such overdose.

“Seeks medical assistance” means accesses or assists in accessing the 9-1-1 system or otherwise contacts or assists in contacting law enforcement or a poison control center or provides care to a person experiencing or believed to be experiencing an alcohol related overdose while awaiting the arrival of medical assistance to aid such person.

Any person who in good faith seeks medical assistance for someone who is experiencing an alcohol related overdose shall not be arrested, charged, or prosecuted for a violation of paragraphs (2) through (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section if the evidence for the arrest, charge, or prosecution of such violation resulted from seeking such medical assistance. Any person who is experiencing an alcohol related overdose and, in good faith, seeks medical assistance for himself or herself or is the subject of such a request shall not be arrested, charged, or prosecuted for a violation of paragraphs (2) through (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section if the evidence for the arrest, charge, or prosecution of such violation resulted from seeking such medical assistance. Any such person shall also not be subject to:

Penalties for a violation of a permanent or temporary protective order or restraining order; or

Sanctions for a violation of a condition of pretrial release, condition of probation, or condition of parole based on a violation of paragraphs (2) through (5) of subsection (a) of this Code section.

Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the admissibility of any evidence in connection with the investigation or prosecution of a crime with regard to a defendant who does not qualify for the protections of paragraph (2) of this subsection or with regard to other crimes committed by a person who otherwise qualifies for protection pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit any seizure of evidence or contraband otherwise permitted by law. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit or abridge the authority of a law enforcement officer to detain or take into custody a person in the course of an investigation or to effectuate an arrest for any offense except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-510, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 22; Ga. L. 1985, p. 753, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 782, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 789, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1372, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1227, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1085, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 683, § 2A-1/HB 965.

Cross references.

Designation of child who possesses alcoholic beverages as a “child in need of services,” §

15-11-2(11)

.

Contributing to delinquency of minor, §

16-12-1

.

Authority of State Board of Education regarding instructional programs and materials pertaining to effects of alcohol, §

20-2-13

.

Age of majority, §

39-1-1

.

Motor carriers prohibited from transporting passengers under age 21 drinking alcohol, §

40-1-108

.

Parents’ right to action against persons selling or furnishing alcoholic beverages to underage child, § 51-1-18.

Liability for acts of intoxicated persons, § 51-1-40.

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B. J. 189 (1969).

3-3-23.1.
Procedure and penalties upon violation of Code Section 3-3-23.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly to violate any prohibition contained in Code Section 3-3-23, relating to furnishing alcoholic beverages to, and purchasing, attempting to purchase, and possession of alcoholic beverages by, a person under 21 years of age.

Any person convicted of violating any prohibition contained in subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23 shall, upon the first conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor, except that any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23 shall, upon the first conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by not more than six months’ imprisonment or a fine of not more than $300.00, or both and except that any person convicted of violating paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23 shall, upon the first conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.

Any person convicted of violating any prohibition contained in subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23 shall, upon the second or subsequent conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature, except that any person convicted of violating paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23 shall, upon the second or subsequent conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.

As used in this subsection, the term:

“Criminal history record information” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 35-3-30.

“Restrict” or “restriction” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 35-3-37.

Whenever any person who has not been previously convicted of any offense under this Code section or under any other law of the United States or this or any other state relating to alcoholic beverages pleads guilty to or is found guilty of a violation of paragraph (2) or (3) of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23, the court, without entering a judgment of guilt and with the consent of such person, may defer further proceedings and place such person on probation upon such reasonable terms and conditions as the court may require. The terms of probation shall preferably be such as require the person to undergo a comprehensive rehabilitation program (including, if necessary, medical treatment), not to exceed three years, designed to acquaint such person with the ill effects of alcohol abuse and with knowledge of the gains and benefits which can be achieved by being a good member of society. Upon violation of a term or condition of probation, the court may enter an adjudication of guilt and proceed accordingly. Upon fulfillment of the terms and conditions of probation, the court shall discharge such person and dismiss the proceedings against him or her. Discharge and dismissal under this subsection shall be without court adjudication of guilt and shall not be deemed a conviction for purposes of this subsection or for purposes of disqualifications or disabilities imposed by law upon conviction of a crime. Discharge and dismissal under this subsection may occur only once with respect to any person.

At the time of sentencing, a defendant may seek to limit public access to his or her sentencing information, and the court may, in its discretion, order that:

The defendant’s records shall be restricted in accordance with Code Section 35-3-37;

The criminal file, docket books, criminal minutes, final record, all other records of the court, and the defendant’s criminal history record information in the custody of the clerk of court, including within any index, be sealed and unavailable to the public; and

The defendant’s criminal history record information of arrest, including any fingerprints or photographs taken in conjunction with such arrest, be restricted by law enforcement agencies, jails, or detention centers.

When considering the defendant’s request under this paragraph, the court shall weigh the public’s interest in the defendant’s criminal history record information being publicly available and the harm to the defendant’s privacy and issue written findings of fact thereupon.

The court shall specify the date that such sealing and restrictions will take effect.

Except as provided for in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a law enforcement officer shall arrest by issuance of a citation, pursuant to Code Section 17-4-23, any person accused of violating paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23. The citation shall enumerate the specific charges against the person and either the date upon which the person is to appear and answer the charges or a notation that the person will be later notified of the date upon which the person is to appear and answer the charges. If the person charged shall fail to appear as required, the judge having jurisdiction of the offense may issue a warrant or other order directing the apprehension of such person and commanding that such person be brought before the court to answer the charges contained within the citation and the charge of his or her failure to appear as required. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to invalidate an otherwise valid arrest by citation, summons, or accusation of a person who is intoxicated and who has committed an offense under the laws of this state other than that provided for in Code Section 3-3-23. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to restrict the discretion of the prosecuting attorney to use a uniform traffic citation as the formal charging document.

If the arresting officer provided for in paragraph (1) of this subsection has probable cause to believe that a person accused of violating paragraph (2), (3), or (5) of subsection (a) of Code Section 3-3-23 is intoxicated to the extent that he or she poses a danger to himself or herself or to the person or property of another, the arresting officer may effect a custodial arrest of such person in addition to the issuance of a citation, summons, or accusation. The citation, summons, or accusation shall enumerate the specific charges against the person and either the date upon which the person is to appear and answer the charges or a notation that the person will be later notified of the date upon which the person is to appear and answer the charges. In all such cases provided for under this subsection, the provisions of Code Section 17-6-1 shall apply. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to invalidate an otherwise valid arrest by citation, summons, or accusation of a person who is intoxicated and who has committed an offense under the laws of this state other than that provided for in Code Section 3-3-23.

A law enforcement officer arresting a person by the issuance of a citation under paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of this Code section may require any such person having a driver’s license or instruction permit to deposit such license or permit with the arresting officer in order to ensure the appearance of such person to answer the charges against him or her. The procedures and rules connected with the acceptance of such license or permit and subsequent disposition of the case shall be the same as provided for the acceptance of a driver’s license as bail on arrest for traffic offenses pursuant to Code Section 17-6-11.

In addition to any other punishment or sentence, the court may order all persons convicted under subsection (b) of this Code section or sentenced under subsection (c) of this Code section to complete a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services within 120 days of such conviction or sentence. Failure to complete such program within 120 days shall be contempt of court and shall be punished by a fine of not more than $300.00 or 20 days’ imprisonment, or both. If the conviction or sentence results from a charge of unlawful possession of alcoholic beverages while operating a motor vehicle, the court shall report such conviction or sentence to the Department of Driver Services within ten days after conviction or sentencing.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 862, § 3; Code 1933, § 5A-9901.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 64; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 3; Ga. L. 1985, p. 753, §§ 2, 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 782, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2746, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1085, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1106, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 2-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 206, § 7/HB 1248; Ga. L. 2014, p. 710, § 1-1/SB 298; Ga. L. 2015, p. 60, § 1-1/SB 100; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1212, § 1/SB 160; Ga. L. 2020, p. 753, § 2-1/SB 288.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added paragraph (c)(1); redesignated former subsection (c) as paragraph (c)(2); and added paragraph (c)(3).

Cross references.

Alcohol and drug education programs for persons whose drivers’ licenses have been revoked, §

40-5-80

et seq.

Probation generally, T. 42, C. 8.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 60, § 6-1/SB 100, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that this Act shall apply to offenses which occur on or after July 1, 2015.

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to welfare to minors, see 6 Ga. St. B. J. 189 (1969).

3-3-24.
Dispensing, serving, selling, or taking orders for alcoholic beverages by persons under 18 years of age.

No person shall allow or require a person in his employment under 18 years of age to dispense, serve, sell, or take orders for any alcoholic beverages.

This Code section shall not prohibit persons under 18 years of age who are employed in supermarkets, convenience stores, breweries, or drugstores from selling or handling alcoholic beverages which are sold for consumption off the premises.

History.

Ga. L. 1958, p. 640, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1974, p. 460, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 409, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-510, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-511, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 22.

Cross references.

Designation of person under age 17 who possesses alcoholic beverages as a “child in need of services,” §

15-11-2(11)

.

Contributing to delinquency of minor, §

16-12-1

.

Authority of State Board of Education regarding instructional programs and materials pertaining to effects of alcohol, §

20-2-13

.

Age of majority, §

39-1-1

.

Parents’ right of action against persons selling or furnishing alcoholic beverages to underage child, § 51-1-18.

Law reviews.

For article recommending more consistency in age requirements of laws pertaining to welfare of minors, see 6 Ga. St. B. J. 189 (1969).

3-3-24.1.
“Bouncer” defined; admission of under 21 year olds into bar.

As used in this Code section, the term “bouncer” means an individual primarily performing duties related to verifying age for admittance, security, maintaining order, or safety, or a combination thereof.

No person shall allow or require an individual under the age of 21 to serve as a bouncer on a premises or in an establishment where alcoholic beverages are dispensed, served, or sold pursuant to a license issued under this title.

No individual under the age of 21 shall enter or be allowed to enter a bar unless he or she is accompanied by his or her parent, guardian, or spouse who is 21 years of age or older. This subsection shall not apply to an individual while he or she is attending a live musical concert or live presentation of the performing arts for which he or she has paid an admission charge.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-3-24.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 578, § 3/HB 152.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section formerly pertained to definitions and penalties.
The former Code section was based on Code 1933, § 5A-519, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 25; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 237, § 2, and was repealed by Ga. L. 2014, p. 187, § 1/HB 737, effective July 1, 2014.

3-3-24.2.
Posting of laws regarding sale of alcoholic beverages to underage persons.

Each retail business establishment in this state which is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages of any kind shall post in a conspicuous place or places a notice which shall contain the provisions of the laws of this state which deal with the unlawful sale of such items to underage persons and the penalties for violating such laws.

The department shall prepare, print, and distribute the notices required by subsection (a) of this Code section. The notices shall contain those provisions of the law of this state which the department determines will best inform the citizens of this state of the relevant provisions of the law regarding sale of alcoholic beverages to underage persons.

The commissioner may take punitive action against violators, up to and including revocation of the state retail dealer’s license of any retail business establishment which fails to comply with this Code section. The undertaking of any punitive action allowed under this Code section shall not prohibit criminal prosecution for sale to underage persons.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-520, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 26.

3-3-25.
Sale of or furnishing alcoholic beverages to prisoners or inmates of places of confinement; introduction or possession of alcoholic beverages at Georgia War Veterans Home.

No person knowingly and intentionally shall:

Offer for sale, sell, barter, exchange, give, provide, or furnish alcoholic beverages to any person confined in any jail, penal institution, correctional facility, or other lawful place of confinement; or

Introduce or possess any alcoholic beverages in the buildings of the Georgia War Veterans Home operated for the use and care of disabled war veterans.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall prevent or prohibit:

The administration of alcohol by the staff of the institutions provided for in subsection (a) of this Code section to any prisoner, patient, or lawful inmate in strict compliance with the prescription of a licensed physician; or

The staff members of the Georgia War Veterans Home who maintain their domicile on the grounds of such institution from possessing alcoholic beverages for their own consumption or for that of their families or persons invited to their homes, except patients or lawful inmates of such institution.

No person shall knowingly allow any other person to violate this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1874, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 1875, p. 328, § 1; Code 1882, § 1374a; Penal Code 1895, § 437; Penal Code 1910, § 437; Code 1933, § 58-607; Ga. L. 1977, p. 183, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1247, § 1; Code 1933, § 5A-512, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 81, § 2/HB 85.

Cross references.

Restriction on sale of spirituous beverages at or near armories, camps, and other facilities of the organized militia or other place where the force is performing military duty, §

38-2-306

.

Furnishing of alcoholic beverages to inmates of correctional institutions, §

42-5-18

.